Hawaii statutes.
[§658F-8] Stay of proceedings pending
appeal of foreign-country judgment. If a party establishes that an appeal
from a foreign-country judgment is pending or will be taken, the court may stay
any proceedings with regard to the foreign-country judgment until the appeal is
concluded, the time for appeal expires, or the appellant has had sufficient
time to prosecute the appeal and has failed to do so. [L 2009, c 34, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next